Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.020

Workforce training and education coordinating board.

(1) There is hereby created the workforce training and education coordinating board as a state agency and as the successor agency to the state board for vocational education. Once the coordinating board has convened, all references to the state board for vocational education in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the workforce training and education coordinating board, except that reference to the state board for vocational education in RCW 49.04.030 shall mean the state board for community and technical colleges.

(2)(a) The board shall consist of nine voting members appointed by the governor with the consent of the senate, as follows: Three representatives of business, three representatives of labor, and, serving as ex officio members, the superintendent of public instruction, the executive director of the state board for community and technical colleges, and the commissioner of the employment security department. The chair of the board shall be a nonvoting member selected by the governor with the consent of the senate, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. In selecting the chair, the governor shall seek a person who understands the future economic needs of the state and nation and the role that the state's training system has in meeting those needs. Each voting member of the board may appoint a designee to function in his or her place with the right to vote. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall seek to ensure geographic, ethnic, and gender diversity and balance. The governor shall also seek to ensure diversity and balance by the appointment of persons with disabilities.

(b) The business representatives shall be selected from among nominations provided by a statewide business organization representing a cross section of industries. However, the governor may request, and the organization shall provide, an additional list or lists from which the governor shall select the business representatives. The nominations and selections shall reflect the cultural diversity of the state, including women, people with disabilities, and racial and ethnic minorities, and diversity in sizes of businesses.

(c) The labor representatives shall be selected from among nominations provided by statewide labor organizations. However, the governor may request, and the organizations shall provide, an additional list or lists from which the governor shall select the labor representatives. The nominations and selections shall reflect the cultural diversity of the state, including women, people with disabilities, and racial and ethnic minorities.

(d) Each business member may cast a proxy vote or votes for any business member who is not present and who authorizes in writing the present member to cast such vote.

(e) Each labor member may cast a proxy vote for any labor member who is not present and who authorizes in writing the present member to cast such vote.

(f) The chair shall appoint to the board one nonvoting member to represent racial and ethnic minorities, women, and people with disabilities. The nonvoting member appointed by the chair shall serve for a term of four years with the term expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term.

(g) The business members of the board shall serve for terms of four years, the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term except that in the case of initial members, one shall be appointed to a two-year term and one appointed to a three-year term.

(h) The labor members of the board shall serve for terms of four years, the terms expiring on June 30th of the fourth year of the term except that in the case of initial members, one shall be appointed to a two-year term and one appointed to a three-year term.

(i) Any vacancies among board members representing business or labor shall be filled by the governor with nominations provided by statewide organizations representing business or labor, respectively.

(j) The board shall adopt bylaws and shall meet at least bimonthly and at such other times as determined by the chair who shall give reasonable prior notice to the members or at the request of a majority of the voting members.

(k) Members of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.040 and shall receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(l) The board shall be formed and ready to assume its responsibilities under this chapter by October 1, 1991.

(m) The director of the board shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three names submitted by a committee made up of the business and labor members of the board. However, the governor may request, and the committee shall provide, an additional list or lists from which the governor shall select the director. The governor may dismiss the director only with the approval of a majority vote of the board. The board, by a majority vote, may dismiss the director with the approval of the governor.

(3) The state board for vocational education is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the workforce training and education coordinating board. All references to the director or the state board for vocational education in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director or the workforce training and education coordinating board.

[ 2010 c 128 s 6; 1991 c 238 s 3.]